Maine, session 132, LD2066.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §3731-B is enacted to read:
§3731-B. Child Care Employment Award
The Child Care Employment Award is established in the department in order to provide
child care subsidies to recipients who are employed by child care facilities or family child
care providers licensed pursuant to section 8301-A and whose children are receiving care
from such licensed child care facilities or licensed family child care providers. Subsidy
awards must be provided directly to the child care facility or family child care provider.
The department may adopt rules regarding subsidy award amounts, waiting list
management, quality standards and limitations on the number of children supported. Rules
adopted pursuant to this section are routine technical rules pursuant to Title 5, chapter 375,
subchapter 2-A.
Sec. 2. Child Care Employment Award staffing. The Department of Health
and Human Services shall establish a full-time, permanent staff position in the Office of
Child and Family Services to administer the Child Care Employment Award pursuant to
the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 22, section 3731-B.
Sec. 3. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES, DEPARTMENT OF
Child Care Services 0563
Initiative: Provides ongoing funding for the Child Care Employment Award.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $3,000,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $3,000,000
2262 Child Care Services 0563
Initiative: Establishes one Social Services Program Specialist II position to administer the
Child Care Employment Award and provides funding for related All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 1.000
Personal Services $0 $119,041
All Other $0 $7,256
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $126,297
3259
HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES,
DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27

GENERAL FUND $0 $3,126,297
__________ __________
Page 1 - 132LR2763(01)

DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $0 $3,126,297